Wyoming, session 2025, HB0285.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 35-7-360(c) and by creating a new
subsection (e) is amended to read:

35-7-360. Liability for damage; warning labels;
service of process.

(c) Except as provided by subsection (e) of this
section, nothing in this act shall be construed to relieve
HB0285

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0762
any person from liability for any damage to the person or
lands of another caused by the use of pesticides even
though such use conforms to the rules and regulations of
this act.

(e) The duty of a manufacturer or seller of a
pesticide to warn a consumer or the public about the risks
associated with the pesticide shall be presumed to be
satisfied if the pesticide bears the label approved by the
United States environmental protection agency under the
Insecticide, Fungicide and Rodenticide Act, 7 U.S.C. § 136
et seq., and the pesticide is registered by the department.
This presumption may be rebutted only by a showing that the
weight of scientific evidence does not support the
scientific basis on which the required warning is premised
and that the manufacturer or seller knew or should have
known at the time the pesticide was sold that the required
warning was not supported by the weight of scientific
evidence. At a minimum, evidence to rebut the presumption
shall be academically peer reviewed, published in a
recognized academic journal, capable of replication and
reflected by a reliable application of scientific
HB0285

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0762
principles and methods to the risks associated with the use
of the product.

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0285